Hawaii statutes.
§438-2 License required. (a) It shall
be unlawful for any person in the State to engage in the practice of barbering
for compensation unless the person has first obtained a license, apprentice
permit, or temporary permit.

(b) It shall be unlawful for any person to
operate a barber shop in the State unless the person has first obtained a
license for the barber shop.

(c) The practice of barbering shall be carried
on only by persons holding a license, apprentice permit, or temporary permit to
practice in this State and only in licensed barber shops, except that a duly
licensed barber may practice barbering at a health care, nursing, mental or
correctional facility, barber school, beauty shop, charitable event, or a
person's private home, office, or hotel room when requested to do so. [L 1947,
c 194, §2; RL 1955, §58-2; HRS §438-2; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 246, §2; am L
1993, c 264, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next